Vermont statutes. Title 6 Agriculture
Subchapter 1. General Provisions

§ 4801.
Purpose; State policy.

It is the purpose of this chapter to ensure that agricultural animal wastes do not enter the waters of this State. Therefore, it is State policy that:

All farms meet certain standards in the handling and disposal of animal wastes, as provided by this chapter, and the cost of meeting these standards shall not be borne by farmers only, but rather by all members of society, who are in fact the beneficiaries. Accordingly, State and federal funds shall be made available to farms, regardless of size, to defray the major cost of complying with the requirements of this chapter. State and federal conservation programs to assist farmers should be directed to those farms that need to improve their infrastructure to prohibit direct discharges or bring existing water pollution control structures into compliance with U.S. Department of Agriculture (U.S.D.A.) Natural Resources Conservation Service standards. Additional resources should be directed to education and technical assistance for farmers to improve the management of agricultural wastes and protect water quality.

Officials who administer the provisions of this chapter:

shall educate farmers and other affected citizens on requirements of this chapter through an outreach collaboration with farm associations and other community groups;

shall, in the process of rendering official decisions, afford farmers and other affected citizens an opportunity to be heard and give consideration to all interests expressed; and

may provide grants from a program established under this chapter to eligible Vermont municipalities, local or regional governmental agencies, nonprofit organizations, and citizen groups in order to provide direct financial assistance to farms in implementing conservation practices.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 3, 2004; amended

2013, No. 83

, § 10, eff. June 10, 2013.

§ 4802.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Agency” means the Agency of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

“Farming” has the same meaning as used in

10 V.S.A. § 6001(22)

.

“Good standing” means a participant in a program administered under this chapter:

does not have an active enforcement violation that has reached a final order with the Secretary; and

is in compliance with all terms of a current grant agreement or contract with the Agency.

“Healthy soil” means soil that has a well-developed, porous structure, is chemically balanced, supports diverse microbial communities, and has abundant organic matter.

“Manure” means livestock waste in solid or liquid form that may also contain bedding, spilled feed, water, or soil.

“Secretary” means the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets.

“Top of bank” means the point along the bank of a stream where an abrupt change in slope is evident, and where the stream is generally able to overflow the banks and enter the adjacent floodplain during an annual flood event. Annual flood event shall be determined according to the Agency of Natural Resources’ Flood Hazard Area and River Corridor Protection Procedure.

“Waste” or “agricultural waste” means material originating or emanating from a farm that is determined by the Secretary or the Secretary of Natural Resources to be harmful to the waters of the State, including: sediments; minerals, including heavy metals; plant nutrients; pesticides; organic wastes, including livestock waste, animal mortalities, compost, feed and crop debris; waste oils; pathogenic bacteria and viruses; thermal pollution; silage runoff; untreated milk house waste; and any other farm waste as the term “waste” is defined in

10 V.S.A. § 1251(12)

.

“Water” has the same meaning as used in

10 V.S.A. § 1251(13)

.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 149

(Adj. Sess.), § 2, eff. June 3, 2004; amended

2015, No. 64

, § 2;

2019, No. 64

, § 5.

§ 4803.
Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund.

There is created the Agricultural Water Quality Special Fund to be administered by the Secretary of Agriculture, Food and Markets. Fees collected under this chapter, including fees for permits or certifications issued under the chapter, shall be deposited in the Fund.

The Secretary may use monies deposited in the Fund for the Secretary’s implementation and administration of agricultural water quality programs or requirements established by this chapter, including to pay salaries of Agency staff necessary to implement the programs and requirements of this chapter.

Notwithstanding the requirements of

32 V.S.A. § 588(3)

, interest earned by the Fund shall be retained in the Fund from year to year.

HISTORY:

Added

2015, No. 64

, § 5a.